Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Meadowlark Act:

(1) Contribution means a donation which is made for the purpose of providing a source of funding for the Meadowlark Program established in section 85-2804;

(2) Eligible postsecondary educational institution has the same meaning as in section 77-1416;

(3) Nebraska educational savings plan trust has the same meaning as in section 77-1416;

(4) Qualified education expenses has the same meaning as in section 77-1416; and

(5) Qualified individual means an individual born on or after January 1, 2020, who is a resident of this state at the time of birth.

Laws 2019, LB610, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1042, § 6;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 66;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 56.